Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 3.2 Snowmobiles and Recreational Vehicles

31-3.2-1.
Definitions.

For the purpose of this chapter, the terms defined in this section have the following meanings ascribed to them:

“Dealer” means a person, partnership, or corporation engaged in the business of selling snowmobiles or recreational vehicles at wholesale or retail.

“Director” means the director of the department of environmental management acting directly or through his or her authorized agent.

“Manufacturer” means a person, partnership or corporation engaged in the business of manufacturing snowmobiles or recreational vehicles.

“Operate” means to ride in, on, and control the operation of a snowmobile or recreational vehicle.

“Operator” means every person who operates or is in actual physical control of a snowmobile or recreational vehicle.

“Owner” means a person, other than a lienholder, having the property in or title to a snowmobile or to a recreational vehicle or entitled to the use or possession of one.

“Person” includes an individual, partnership, corporation, the state and its agencies and subdivisions, and any body of persons, whether incorporated or not.

“Recreational vehicle” means a motor vehicle including minibikes designed to travel over unimproved terrain and which has been determined by the division of motor vehicles as unsuitable for operation on the public way and not eligible for registration for such use. This shall not be construed to include golf mobiles or golf carts, riding lawn mowers, or garden tractors, which are not registered as farm vehicles, but shall include any three (3) wheel driven vehicle and any other four (4) wheel driven vehicle, regardless of type or design, including all classes of all-terrain vehicles.

“Register” means the act of assigning a registration number of a snowmobile or recreational vehicle.

“Roadway” means that portion of a highway improved, designed, or ordinarily used for vehicular travel.

“Snowmobile” means a motor vehicle designed to travel over ice or snow supported in whole or in part by skis, belts, cleats, or low-pressure tires.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 117, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 85, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 334, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 412, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 413, § 1.

31-3.2-2.
Registration.

General requirements. Except as provided in this chapter, no person shall operate any snowmobile or recreational vehicle within the state unless the snowmobile or recreational vehicle has been registered in accordance with this chapter. Any operator of any snowmobile or recreational vehicle not registered in accordance with this chapter shall be deemed guilty of a civil violation and be subject to a fine of one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense. All recreational vehicles sold by a dealer shall be registered at time of sale of such vehicle. Any recreational vehicle purchased for use exclusively outside of the state of Rhode Island shall not require registration at the time of purchase; provided that the purchaser of such recreational vehicle shall sign a declaration, provided by the director via the dealer, stating that the purchaser understands the conditions under which a recreational vehicle must be registered and the penalty for violation of such registration requirements. Each signed declaration shall be forwarded by the dealer to the director.

Recreational vehicle safety course and safety certificate. The director shall establish a curriculum or curricula for a recreational vehicle safety training course or courses. Any such curriculum may include, but not be limited to, on-vehicle training and safe riding practices. The director may establish different courses and curricula for different types of recreational vehicles. The director may permit any such safety training course to be given by any private person, club, association or municipality that meets standards established by the director. The director may establish a reasonable fee that any such person or entity may charge for such course or courses.

The safety course shall be required for all first time recreational vehicle buyers, as well as all operators under the age of sixteen (16). Proof of completion of safety course shall be carried while operating any recreational vehicle off private property.

Application — Issuance — Reports. Application for registration shall be made to the director in such form as the director shall prescribe, and shall state the name and address of every owner of the snowmobile or recreational vehicle and be signed by at least one owner. Upon receipt of the application and the appropriate fee, the snowmobile or recreational vehicle shall be registered and a reflectorized identification number assigned which shall be affixed to the snowmobile or recreational vehicle in such manner as the director shall prescribe.

Fees for registration.

The fee for registration of each snowmobile or recreational vehicle, other than those registered by a dealer or manufacturer pursuant to subsection (c)(1) or (c)(2) shall be as follows: twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for one year and one dollar ($1.00) for a duplicate or transfer.

The total registration fee for all snowmobiles or recreational vehicles owned by a dealer and operated for demonstration or testing purposes shall be twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per year.

The total registration fee for all snowmobiles or recreational vehicles owned by a manufacturer and operated for research, testing, experimentation, or demonstration purposes shall be one hundred dollars ($100) per year. Dealer and manufacturer registrations are not transferable.

In addition to the registration fees enumerated in subdivisions (1) — (3) of this subsection, an annual registration fee of ten dollars ($10.00) for residents and twenty dollars ($20.00) for nonresidents on all off-road facilities established by the department of environmental management for such purposes. No person shall operate any recreational vehicles on off-road facilities which has not been registered as required by this subdivision.

Renewal. Every owner of a snowmobile or recreational vehicle shall renew his or her registration in such manner as the director shall prescribe, upon payment of the same registration fees provided in subsection (c).

Snowmobiles or recreational vehicles owned by state or political subdivision. A registration number shall be issued without the payment of a fee for snowmobiles or recreational vehicles owned by the state of Rhode Island or a political subdivision of the state upon application for it.

Exemptions. No registration under this section shall be required for the following described snowmobiles or recreational vehicles:

Snowmobiles or recreational vehicles owned and used by the United States, another state, or a political subdivision of the United States or another state.

Special Permits. The director of environmental management may issue special permits to out of state snowmobiles or recreational vehicles from a state or country where registration is not required to operate in Rhode Island for limited periods of time not to exceed thirty (30) days in connection with organized group outings, trail rides, races, rallies, and other promotional events.

Non-resident recreational vehicle registration. The registration provisions of this section shall not apply to non-resident owners who have registered their recreational vehicles in compliance with the registration and licensing laws of the state, province, district or country of residence in which they reside, provided that the recreational vehicle is appropriately identified in accordance with the laws of the state of residence. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to a resident of another state, province, district or country that does not have a recreational vehicle registration and identification law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 117, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 387, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 413, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 6, § 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 59; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 33, § 7; P.L. 2008, ch. 127, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 179, § 1.

31-3.2-3.
Disposition of fees.

All fees from registration of snowmobiles or recreational vehicles shall be deposited as general revenues.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 117, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 387, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 102.

31-3.2-4.
Transfer or termination of ownership.

Within fifteen (15) days after the transfer of ownership, or any part of it, other than a security interest, or the destruction or abandonment of any snowmobile or recreational vehicle, written notice of that transfer or destruction shall be given to the director in any form that he or she shall prescribe.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 117, § 1.

31-3.2-4.1.
Operation of snowmobile or recreational vehicle without permission — Penalty.

No person shall operate any snowmobile or recreational vehicle upon any property or premises owned by another person without the consent in writing of the owner of the property or premises.

No person shall operate any snowmobile or recreational vehicle which is owned by another person without the consent in writing of the owner.

Penalties. Any person who shall violate the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a civil violation and be subject to a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 413, § 3; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 6, § 2.

31-3.2-5.
Licensing by political subdivisions.

No political subdivision of this state shall require licensing or registration of snowmobiles or recreational vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 117, § 1.

31-3.2-6.
Rules and regulations.

With a view of achieving maximum use of snowmobiles and/or recreational vehicles, the director of natural resources shall adopt rules and regulations for the following purposes:

Registration of snowmobiles and recreational vehicles and display of registration numbers.

Use of snowmobiles and recreational vehicles insofar as game and fish resources are affected.

Use of snowmobiles and recreational vehicles on public lands and waters under the jurisdiction of the director.

Uniform signs to be used by the state, counties, cities and towns, which are necessary or desirable to control, direct, or regulate the operation and use of snowmobiles and recreational vehicles.

Specifications relating to snowmobiles and recreational vehicles’ mufflers.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles may adopt rules and regulations not inconsistent with this chapter in the manner provided by this title regulating the use of snowmobiles and recreational vehicles on streets and highways.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 117, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 127, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 179, § 1.

31-3.2-7.
Operation.

Operation on streets and highways.

No person shall operate a snowmobile or recreational vehicle upon the roadway shoulder, on the inside bank or slope on any highway in this state, or elsewhere within the right of way, except as provided in this chapter. No snowmobile or recreational vehicle shall be operated at any time within the right of way of any interstate highway or freeway within this state.

A snowmobile or recreational vehicle may make a direct crossing of a street or highway at any hour of the day provided:

The crossing is made at an angle of approximately ninety degrees (90 degrees) to the direction of the highway and at a place where no obstruction prevents a quick and safe crossing;

The snowmobile or recreational vehicle is brought to a complete stop before crossing the shoulder or main traveled way of the highway;

The driver yields the right of way to all oncoming traffic which constitutes an immediate hazard;

In crossing a divided highway the crossing is made only at an intersection of the highway, with another public street or highway; and

If the crossing is made between the hours of one-half (1/2) hour after sunset to one-half (1/2) hour before sunrise or in conditions of reduced visibility, only if both front and rear lights are on.

No snowmobile or recreational vehicle shall be operated upon a public street or highway unless it is equipped with at least one head lamp and one tail lamp, each of minimum candlepower as prescribed by regulations of the director; reflector material of a minimum area of sixteen (16) square inches mounted on each side forward of the handlebars; and with brakes. All of these shall conform to standards prescribed by rule of the director.

A snowmobile or recreational vehicle may be operated upon a public street or highway other than as provided by subsection (a)(2) in an emergency during the period of time when and at locations where snow upon the roadway renders travel by automobile impractical.

International contests, use of highways, etc. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the use of snowmobiles or recreational vehicles within the right of way of any highway or upon public lands or waters under the jurisdiction of the director of environmental management in any international contest, subject to the consent of the official or board having jurisdiction over the highway or public lands or waters.

Operation generally. It shall be unlawful for any person to drive or operate any snowmobile or recreational vehicles in the following unsafe or harassing ways:

At a rate of speed greater than reasonable or proper under all the surrounding circumstances;

In a careless, reckless or negligent manner so as to endanger the person or property of another or to cause injury or damage to it;

While under the influence of intoxicating liquor or narcotics, or habit-forming drugs;

Without a lighted head light and tail light when required for safety;

In any tree nursery or planting in a manner which damages or destroys growing stock; or

Without the operator and passengers wearing a helmet equipped with a face guard of a type approved by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles.

The provisions of §§

31-27-2

and

31-27-2

.1 relating to weight of alcohol in the defendant’s blood and its admission as evidence shall apply to subparagraph (C) of this paragraph.

It shall be unlawful for any person to drive or operate any snowmobile or other motorized recreational vehicle upon any above-ground reservoir property of the Woonsocket reservoir in the towns of North Smithfield, Lincoln, and Smithfield, and in the city of Woonsocket. Any person who shall violate the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a civil violation and be punished by a fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00) for the first offense and by a fine of one hundred dollars ($100) for any subsequent offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 117, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 67, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 80, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 6, § 2.

31-3.2-7.1.
Operation prohibited within valley marshes.

No person shall operate a motorcycle, recreational vehicle or other motorized vehicle within the Blackstone Valley Flood Plains or Marshes, also known as the “Valley Marshes.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 77, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 127, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 179, § 1.

31-3.2-8.
Mufflers.

Except as provided in this section, every snowmobile or recreational vehicle shall be equipped at all times with a muffler in good working order which blends the exhaust noise into the overall snowmobile or recreational vehicle noise and is in constant operation to prevent excessive or unusual noise. The exhaust system shall not emit or produce a sharp popping or crackling sound. This section does not apply to organized races or similar competitive events held on:

Private lands, with the permission of the owner, lessee or custodian of the land;

Public lands and water under the jurisdiction of the director, with the director’s permission; or

Other public lands, with the consent of the public agency owning the land. No person shall have for sale, sell, or offer for sale on any new snowmobile or recreational vehicle any muffler that fails to comply with the specifications required by the rules and regulations of the director after the effective date of the rules and regulations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 117, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 324, § 10; P.L. 2008, ch. 127, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 179, § 1.

31-3.2-9.
Crossing of highways by youthful operators — Prohibitions.

No person under sixteen (16) years of age shall make a direct crossing of a state highway as the operator of a snowmobile or recreational vehicle. A person sixteen (16) years of age or older, but less than eighteen (18) years of age, may make a direct crossing of a highway only if he or she has in his or her immediate possession a valid motor vehicle operator’s license.

No one shall carry a firearm, rifle, or shotgun in or on a snow vehicle, a recreational vehicle, or on a trailer or sled attached to one unless such firearm, rifle, or shotgun is unloaded and in an enclosed case, unless he or she is a law enforcement officer or other person authorized to carry arms.

It is unlawful for the owner of a snowmobile or recreational vehicle to permit the snowmobile or recreational vehicle to be operated contrary to the provisions of this section. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to supersede the powers of any department of the state, nor of any city, town, commission, or body having authority to regulate the use of lands, waters, or ways within their respective control, or jurisdiction from adopting rules, regulations, ordinances, or by-laws not repugnant to law as to the operation of snow vehicles or recreational vehicles on such lands, waters, or ways, including the prohibition of such operation. Nothing contained in this chapter shall be deemed to constitute a license to operate snow vehicles or recreational vehicles on private land. Any person who operates a snowmobile upon the land of another shall stop and identify himself or herself upon the request of the landowner or his or her duly authorized representative, and if requested to do so by the owner or representative, shall promptly remove the snowmobile from the premises.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 117, § 1.

31-3.2-10.
Penalties.

Any person who violates any provisions of this chapter or any regulation of the director of the department of environmental management or the administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall be guilty of a misdemeanor for a first offense and be punished by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) or by imprisonment for not more than ninety (90) days, or both, and shall be required to take or retake a safety education certificate course that has been approved by the director; for a second offense, be punished by a fine of not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) or by imprisonment for not more than ninety (90) days, or both; and for a third or subsequent offense, be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or by imprisonment for not more than ninety (90) days, or both. The director may suspend or revoke the registration of a snow vehicle or a recreational vehicle, after a hearing, for good cause which shall include, but not be limited to:

Nonownership by the applicant;

The failure of the vehicle to meet equipment standards after the owner has received notice to comply with the standards;

Operation of the vehicle improperly or in such a manner as to cause damage to any property or death or injury to any person, or that the registrant has allowed or permitted the vehicle to be so operated.

Repeat violations of this chapter or any associated regulation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 117, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 127, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 179, § 1.

31-3.2-11.
Liability for negligence.

Negligence in the use of operation of a recreational vehicle shall be attributable to the owner. Every owner of a recreational vehicle used or operated in this state shall be liable and responsible for injury or death or damage to property resulting from negligence in the use or operation of such vehicle by any person using or operating the same with the permission, express or implied, of such owner; provided, however, that such operator’s negligence shall not be attributed to the owner as to any claim or cause of action accruing to the operator or his legal representative for such injuries or death.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 127, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 179, § 2.